Alaska statutes. Title 21. Insurance.
Chapter 18. Assets and Liabilities.
Sec. 21.18.110.
Standard valuation law — Life insurance.

The director shall annually value, or cause to be valued, the reserve liabilities (hereinafter called reserves) for all outstanding life insurance policies, annuity and pure endowment contracts, and deposit-type contracts of every life insurer doing business in this state issued before the operative date of the valuation manual described in AS

21.18.112

. In calculating the reserves for policies and contracts issued before the operative date of the valuation manual described in AS

21.18.112

, the director may use group methods and approximate averages for fractions of a year or otherwise. For an alien insurer, the valuation shall be limited to the alien insurer’s insurance transactions in the United States. For the purpose of making the valuation, the director may employ a qualified actuary who shall be paid by the insurer for which the service is rendered. For a foreign or alien insurer, the director may accept, in lieu of the valuation of the reserves required of a foreign or alien insurer, a valuation made, or caused to be made, by the insurance supervisory official of a state or other jurisdiction if the valuation complies with the minimum standard provided in this section. This subsection provides for the minimum standard for the valuation of reserves for policies and contracts subject to this subsection and applies to a policy and contract issued before the operative date of the valuation manual described in AS 21.18.112. An insurer that has adopted a standard of valuation producing greater aggregate reserves than those calculated according to the minimum standard provided in this section may, with the approval of the director, adopt a lower standard of valuation, but not lower than the minimum provided in this section.

This subsection applies to only those policies and contracts issued on or after the operative date of AS

21.45.300

except as provided in (c) — (k) of this section, (5) and (6) of this subsection for group annuity and pure endowment contracts issued before that operative date, and AS

21.18.112(b)

:

Except as provided in (c) — (k) of this section, (5) and (6) of this subsection, and AS

21.18.112(b)

, the minimum standard for the valuation of all these policies and contracts shall be the commissioners reserve evaluation methods defined in (2)(A) and (B), (4), and (7) of this subsection, and AS 21.18.112(b), three and one-half percent interest, or in the case of policies and contracts, other than annuity and pure endowment contracts, issued on or after July 1, 1978, five and one-half percent interest for single premium life insurance policies and four and one-half percent interest for all other policies, and the following tables:

for all ordinary policies of life insurance issued on the standard basis, excluding disability and accidental death benefits in the policies — the Commissioners 1958 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table, for policies issued before the operative date of AS

21.45.300

(w), of the Standard Nonforfeiture Law for Life Insurance as amended, except that, for a category of policies issued on female risks, all modified net premiums and present values, referred to in (2) of this subsection, may be calculated according to an age not more than six years younger than the actual age of the insured; and for policies issued on or after the operative date of AS

21.45.300(w)

of the Standard Nonforfeiture Law for Life Insurance as amended

the Commissioners 1980 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table;

at the election of the insurer for any one or more specified plans of life insurance, the Commissioners 1980 Standard Ordinary Mortality Table with 10-year Select Mortality Factors; or

any ordinary mortality table, adopted after 1980 by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, that is approved by regulation adopted by the director for use in determining the minimum standard of valuation for the policies;

for all industrial life insurance policies issued on the standard basis, excluding disability and accidental death benefits in the policies — the 1941 Standard Industrial Mortality Table for the policies issued before the operative date of AS

21.45.300(l)

, of the Standard Nonforfeiture Law for Life Insurance as amended, and for the policies issued on or after April 7, 1984, the Commissioners 1961 Standard Industrial Mortality Table or any industrial mortality table, adopted after 1980 by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners that is approved by regulation adopted by the director for use in determining the minimum standard of valuation for those policies;

for individual annuity and pure endowment contracts, excluding disability and accidental death benefits in the policies — the 1937 Standard Annuity Mortality Table, or, at the option of the insurer, the Annuity Mortality Table for 1949, ultimate, or any modification of either of these tables approved by the director;

for group annuity and pure endowment contracts, excluding disability and accidental death benefits in the policies — the Group Annuity Mortality Table for 1951, any modification of the table approved by the director, or, at the option of the insurer, any of the tables or modification of tables specified for individual annuity and pure endowment contracts;

for total and permanent disability benefits in or supplementary to ordinary policies or contracts — the tables of period 2 disablement rates and the 1930 to 1950 termination rates of the 1952 disability study of the society of actuaries, with due regard to the type of benefit or any table of disablement and termination rates adopted after 1980 by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners that are approved by regulation adopted by the director for use in determining the minimum standard of valuation for the policies; the table shall, for active lives, be combined with a mortality table permitted for calculating the reserves for life insurance policies;

for accidental death benefits in or supplementary to policies — the 1959 Accidental Death Benefits Table or any accidental death benefits table adopted after 1980 by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners that is approved by regulation adopted by the director for use in determining the minimum standard of valuation for the policies combined with a mortality table permitted for calculating the reserves for life insurance policies;

for group life insurance, life insurance issued on the substandard basis and other special benefits — tables approved by the director.

Except as otherwise provided in (4) and (7) of this subsection, reserves according to the commissioners reserve valuation method, for the life insurance and endowment benefits of policies providing for a uniform amount of insurance and requiring the payment of uniform premiums, shall be the excess, if any, of the present value, at the date of valuation, of the future guaranteed benefits provided for by the policies, over the then present value of any future modified net premiums; the modified net premiums for the policy shall be the uniform percentage of the respective contract premiums for the benefits that the present value, at the date of issue of the policy, of all the modified net premiums shall be equal to the sum of the then present value of the benefits provided for by the policy and the excess of (A) over (B), as follows:

a net level annual premium equal to the present value, at the date of issue, of the benefits provided for after the first policy year, divided by the present value, at the date of issue of an annuity of one a year payable on the first and each subsequent anniversary of the policy on which a premium falls due; however, the net level annual premium may not exceed the net level annual premium on the 19-year premium whole life plan for insurance of the same amount at an age one year higher than the age at issue of the policy;

a net one-year term premium for the benefits provided for in the first policy year; notwithstanding this paragraph, for a life insurance policy issued on or after January 1, 1987, for which the contract premium in the first policy year exceeds that of the second year and for which no comparable additional benefit is provided in the first year for the excess premium and that provides an endowment benefit or a cash surrender value or a combination of these in an amount greater than the excess premium, the reserve according to the commissioners reserve valuation method as of a policy anniversary occurring on or before the assumed ending date, except as otherwise provided in (4) of this subsection, shall be the greater of the reserve as of the policy anniversary calculated as described in (A) of this paragraph and the reserve as of the policy anniversary; the reserve shall be calculated as described in (A) of this paragraph, except that

the present value shall be reduced by 15 percent of the amount of the excess first year premium;

all present values of benefits and premiums shall be determined without reference to premiums or benefits provided for by the policy after the assumed ending date;

the policy shall be assumed to mature on the assumed ending date as an endowment; and

the cash surrender value provided on the assumed date shall be considered as an endowment benefit; in making the comparison in this subparagraph, the mortality and interest bases stated in (4) and (6) of this subsection and (c) of this section shall be used; in this subparagraph, the assumed ending date is the first policy anniversary on which the sum of the endowment benefit and cash surrender value then available is greater than the excess premium;

reserves according to the commissioners reserve valuation method for

life insurance policies providing for a varying amount of insurance or requiring the payment of varying premiums;

group annuity and pure endowment contracts purchased under a retirement plan or plan of deferred compensation, established or maintained by an employer (including a partnership or sole proprietorship) or by an employee organization, or by both, other than a plan providing individual retirement accounts or individual retirement annuities under 26 U.S.C. 408 (Internal Revenue Code), as amended;

disability and accidental death benefits in all policies and contracts;

all other benefits, except life insurance and endowment benefits in life insurance policies and benefits provided by all other annuity and pure endowment contracts, shall be calculated by a method consistent with the principles of this paragraph, except that any extra premiums charged because of impairments or special hazards shall be disregarded in the determination of modified net premiums.

Reserves for any category of policies, contracts, or benefits as established by the director, may be calculated at the option of the insurer according to standards that produce greater aggregate reserves for the category than those calculated according to the minimum standard provided in this section, but the rate or rates of interest used for policies and contracts, other than annuity and pure endowment contracts, may not be higher than the corresponding rate or rates of interest used in calculating nonforfeiture benefits provided for in the policy or contract.

If, in any contract year, the gross premium charged by a life insurer on a policy or contract is less than the valuation net premium for the policy or contract calculated by the method used in calculating the reserve on the policy or contract but using the minimum valuation standards of mortality and rate of interest, the minimum reserve required for that policy or contract shall be the greater of either the reserve calculated according to the mortality table, rate of interest, and method actually used for the policy or contract, or the reserve calculated by the method actually used for the policy or contract but using the minimum valuation standards of mortality and rate of interest and replacing the valuation net premium by the actual gross premium in each contract year for which the valuation net premium exceeds the actual gross premium. In this paragraph, the minimum valuation standards of mortality and rate of interest are those standards referred to in (b) and (c) of this section. Notwithstanding this paragraph, for a life insurance policy issued on or after January 1, 1987, for which the gross premium in the first policy year exceeds that of the second year and for which no comparable additional benefit is provided in the first year for the excess premium and that provides an endowment benefit or a cash surrender value or a combination of these in an amount greater than the excess premium, the provisions of this paragraph shall be applied as if the method used in calculating the reserve for such a policy were based on a net one-year term premium for the benefits provided for in the first policy year. The minimum reserve at each policy anniversary of such a policy shall be the greater of the minimum reserve calculated under (2)(B) of this subsection, and the minimum reserve calculated under this paragraph.

Except as provided in (c) — (k) of this section, the minimum standard for the valuation of all individual annuity and pure endowment contracts issued on or after the operative date of this paragraph as set out in (6) of this subsection and for all annuities and pure endowments purchased on or after that date under group annuity and pure endowment contracts, shall be the commissioners reserve valuation methods defined in (2) and (7) of this subsection and the following tables and interest rates:

for individual single premium immediate annuity contracts, excluding any disability and accidental death benefits in those contracts — the 1971 individual annuity mortality table or an individual annuity mortality table, adopted after 1980 by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, that is approved by regulation adopted by the director for use in determining the minimum standard of valuation for the contracts, or any modification of these tables approved by the director and seven and one-half percent interest;

for individual annuity and pure endowment contracts, other than single premium immediate annuity contracts, excluding any disability and accidental death benefits in those contracts — the 1971 individual annuity mortality table or an individual annuity mortality table, adopted after 1980 by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, that is approved by regulation adopted by the director for use in determining the minimum standard of valuation for the contracts, or any modification of these tables approved by the director and five and one-half percent interest for single premium deferred annuity and pure endowment contracts and four and one- half percent interest for all other comparable individual annuity and pure endowment contracts;

for all annuities and pure endowments purchased under group annuity and pure endowment contracts, excluding any disability and accidental death benefits purchased under such contracts — 1971 group annuity mortality table or a group annuity mortality table, adopted after 1980 by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, that is approved by regulation adopted by the director for use in determining the minimum standard of valuation for the annuities and pure endowments, or any modification of these tables approved by the director, and seven and one-half percent interest.

After July 1, 1978, an insurer may file with the director a written notice of its election to comply with the provisions of (5) of this subsection after a specified date before January 1, 1979, which shall be the operative date of that requirement for the insurer; however, an insurer may elect a different operative date for individual annuity and pure endowment contracts from that elected for group annuity and pure endowment contracts. If an insurer makes no election, the operative date of (5) of this subsection for the insurer is January 1, 1979.

This paragraph applies to all annuity and pure endowment contracts other than group annuity and pure endowment contracts purchased under a retirement plan or plan of deferred compensation, established or maintained by an employer (including a partnership or sole proprietorship) or by an employee organization, or by both, other than a plan providing individual retirement annuities under 26 U.S.C. 408 (Internal Revenue Code), as amended. Reserves according to the commissioners annuity reserve method for benefits under annuity or pure endowment contracts, excluding any disability and accidental death benefits in those contracts, shall be the greatest of the respective excesses of the present values, at the date of valuation, of the future guaranteed benefits, including guaranteed nonforfeiture benefits, provided for by those contracts at the end of each respective contract year, over the present value, at the date of valuation, of any future valuation considerations derived from future gross considerations, required by the terms of that contract, that become payable before the end of that respective contract year. The future guaranteed benefits shall be determined by using the mortality table, if any, and the interest rate, or rates, specified in those contracts for determining guaranteed benefits. The valuation considerations are the portions of the respective gross considerations applied under the terms of those contracts to determine nonforfeiture values.

The calendar year statutory valuation interest rates defined in (d) of this section shall be the interest rates used in determining the minimum standard for the valuation of

a life insurance policy issued in a particular calendar year, on or after the operative date of AS

21.45.300(w)

;

an individual annuity and pure endowment contract issued in a particular calendar year on or after January 1, 1984;

an annuity and pure endowment purchased in a particular calendar year on or after January 1, 1984 under a group annuity and pure endowment contract; and

the net increase, if any, in a particular calendar year after January 1, 1984, in an amount held under a guaranteed interest contract.

The calendar year statutory valuation interest rates, I, shall be determined as follows and the results rounded to the nearer one-quarter of one percent

for life insurance,

for a single premium immediate annuity and for an annuity benefit involving a life contingency arising from another annuity with a cash settlement option and from a guaranteed interest contract with a cash settlement option,

for other annuities with cash settlement options and other guaranteed interest contracts with cash settlement options, valued on an issue year basis, except as stated in (2) above, the formula for life insurance in (1) of this subsection shall apply to an annuity or guaranteed interest contract with a guarantee duration in excess of 10 years and the formula for a single premium immediate annuity in (2) of this subsection shall apply to an annuity or guaranteed interest contract with a guarantee duration of 10 years or less;

for other annuities with no cash settlement options and for other guaranteed interest contracts with no cash settlement options, the formula for a single premium immediate annuity in (2) of this subsection shall apply;

for other annuities with cash settlement options and guaranteed interest contracts with cash settlement options, valued on a change in fund basis, the formula for a single premium immediate annuity in (2) of this subsection shall apply.

Notwithstanding (d) of this section, if the calendar year statutory valuation interest rate for a life insurance policy differs from the corresponding actual rate for a similar policy issued in the immediately preceding calendar year by less than one-half of one percent, the calendar year statutory valuation interest rate for the life insurance policy shall be equal to the corresponding actual rate for the immediately preceding calendar year. For the purpose of this subsection, the calendar year statutory valuation interest rate shall be determined for 1980 using the reference interest rate defined for 1979 and shall be determined for each following calendar year regardless of the operative date under AS

21.45.300(w)

.

The weighting factors referred to in (c) of this section are as follows:

weighting factors for life insurance:

notwithstanding (3) of this subsection, the weighting factor for a single premium immediate annuity and for an annuity benefit involving a life contingency arising from another annuity with a cash settlement option and a guaranteed interest contract with a cash settlement option -.80;

for annuities and guaranteed interest contracts valued on an issue year basis:

for annuities and guaranteed interest contracts valued on a change in fund basis, the weighting factors shown in (3) of this subsection are increased by .15 for plan type A, .25 for plan type B, and .05 for plan type C;

for annuities and guaranteed interest contracts valued on an issue year basis, other than those with no cash settlement options, that do not guarantee interest on considerations received more than one year after issue or purchase and for annuities and guaranteed interest contracts valued on a change in fund basis that do not guarantee interest rates on considerations received more than 12 months beyond the valuation date, the weighting factors shown in (3) of this subsection or derived in (4) of this subsection are increased by .05.

The guarantee duration for other annuities with cash settlement options and guaranteed interest contracts with cash settlement options is the number of years for which the contract guarantees interest rates in excess of the calendar year statutory valuation interest rate for life insurance policies with guarantee duration in excess of 20 years. For other annuities with no cash settlement options and for guaranteed interest contracts with no cash settlement options, the guarantee duration is the number of years from the date of issue or date of purchase to the date annuity benefits are scheduled to commence.

In this section, “plan type” is defined as follows:

plan type A: at any time policyholder may withdraw funds only

with an adjustment to reflect a change in interest rates or asset values since receipt of the funds by the insurer;

without such adjustment but in installments over five years or more;

as an immediate life annuity; or

no withdrawal permitted;

plan type B: before expiration of the interest rate guarantee, policyholder may withdraw funds only

with adjustment to reflect a change in interest rates or asset values since receipt of the funds by the insurer;

without adjustment but in installments over five years or more; or

no withdrawal permitted; at the end of interest rate guarantee, funds may be withdrawn without adjustment in a single sum or installments over less than five years;

plan type C: policyholder may withdraw funds before expiration of an interest rate guarantee in a single sum or installments over less than five years either

without adjustment to reflect changes in interest rates or asset values since receipt of the funds by the insurer; or

subject only to a fixed surrender charge stipulated in the contract as a percentage of the fund.

An insurer may elect to value a guaranteed interest contract with a cash settlement option and an annuity with a cash settlement option on either an issue year basis or on a change in fund basis. A guaranteed interest contract with no cash settlement option and an annuity with no cash settlement option must be valued on an issue year basis. In this subsection an issue year basis of valuation means a valuation basis under which the interest rate used to determine the minimum valuation standard for the entire duration of the annuity or guaranteed interest contract is the calendar year valuation interest rate for the year of issue or year of purchase of the annuity or guaranteed interest contract, and the change in fund basis of valuation means a valuation basis under which the interest rate used to determine the minimum valuation standard applicable to each change in the fund held under the annuity or guaranteed interest contract is the calendar year valuation interest rate for the year of the change in the fund.

The reference interest rates referred to in (d) and (e) of this section are as follows:

for life insurance, the lesser of the average interest rate for a period of 36 months and the average interest rate for a period of 12 months, ending on June 30 of the calendar year next preceding the year of issue, of Moody’s Corporate Bond Yield Average — Monthly Average Corporates, as published by Moody’s Investors Service, Inc.;

for a single premium immediate annuity and for an annuity benefit involving a life contingency arising from another annuity with a cash settlement option and a guaranteed interest contract with a cash settlement option, the average interest rate for a period of 12 months, ending on June 30 of the calendar year of issue or year of purchase, of Moody’s Corporate Bond Yield Average — Monthly Average Corporates, as published by Moody’s Investors Service, Inc.;

for other annuities with cash settlement options and guaranteed interest contracts with cash settlement options, valued on a year of issue basis, except as provided in (2) of this subsection, with a guarantee duration in excess of 10 years, the lesser of the average interest rate for a period of 36 months and the average interest rate for a period of 12 months, ending on June 30 of the calendar year of issue or purchase, of Moody’s Corporate Bond Yield Average — Monthly Average Corporates, as published by Moody’s Investors Service, Inc.;

for other annuities with cash settlement options and guaranteed interest contracts with cash settlement options, valued on a year of issue basis, except as provided in (2) of this subsection, with a guarantee duration of 10 years or less, the average interest rate for a period of 12 months, ending on June 30 of the calendar year of issue or purchase, of Moody’s Corporate Bond Yield Average — Monthly Average Corporates, as published by Moody’s Investors Service, Inc.;

for other annuities with no cash settlement options and for guaranteed interest contracts with no cash settlement options, the average interest rate for a period of 12 months, ending on June 30 of the calendar year of issue or purchase, of Moody’s Corporate Bond Yield Average — Monthly Average Corporates, as published by Moody’s Investors Service, Inc.;

for other annuities with cash settlement options and guaranteed interest contracts with cash settlement options, valued on a change in fund basis, except as provided in (2) of this subsection, the average interest rate for a period of 12 months, ending on June 30 of the calendar year of the change in the fund, of Moody’s Corporate Bond Yield Average — Monthly Average Corporates, as published by Moody’s Investors Service, Inc.

In the event that Moody’s Corporate Bond Yield Average — Monthly Average Corporates is no longer published by Moody’s Investors Service, Inc., or in the event that the National Association of Insurance Commissioners determines that Moody’s Corporate Bond Yield Average — Monthly Average Corporates as published by Moody’s Investors Service, Inc. is no longer appropriate for the determination of the reference interest rate, an alternative method for determination of the reference interest rate, which is adopted by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners and approved by regulation adopted by the director, may be substituted.

If a plan of life insurance that provides for future premium determination, the amounts of which are to be determined by the insurer based on then estimates of future experience, or if a plan of life insurance or annuity is of a nature that the minimum reserves cannot be determined by the methods described in (b)(2), (4), and (7) of this section, the reserves that are held shall be appropriate in relation to the benefits and the pattern of premiums for that plan, and be computed by a method that is consistent with the principles of this Standard Valuation Law, as determined by regulations adopted by the director.

A life insurer doing business in the state shall annually submit to the director an opinion of a qualified actuary as to whether the reserves and related actuarial items held in support of a policy or contract are computed appropriately, are based on assumptions that satisfy contractual provisions, are consistent with prior reported amounts, and comply with the applicable laws of this state.

The actuarial opinion must

be submitted with the annual statement reflecting the valuation of the reserve liabilities;

apply to all business in force, including individual and group health insurance plans;

be based on standards adopted by the Actuarial Standards Board; and

unless exempted by regulation, include an assessment as to whether the reserves and related actuarial items held in support of the policies and contracts, when considered in light of the assets held by an insurer with respect to the reserves and related actuarial items, including investment earnings on the assets and considerations anticipated to be received and retained under policies and contracts, make adequate provision for an insurer’s obligations under a policy or contract including the benefits under and expenses associated with a policy or contract.

In the case of an actuarial opinion submitted by a foreign or alien insurer, the director may accept an opinion filed by the insurer with the insurance supervisory official of another state that is accredited by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners if the director determines that the opinion meets the requirements applicable to an insurer domiciled in this state.

The director may adopt regulations to provide a transition period for establishing higher reserves that a qualified actuary may consider necessary in order to render the opinion required under (n) of this section.

A qualified actuary who submits an opinion under (m) of this section

is not liable for damages to a person, other than the insurer and the director, for an act, error, omission, decision, or conduct with respect to the actuary’s opinion except in a case of fraud or wilful misconduct;

is subject to disciplinary action by the director; and

shall prepare a memorandum, in form and substance acceptable to the director, to support the actuarial opinion.

If the insurer fails to provide a supporting memorandum as requested by the director within a period specified by regulation or the director determines that the supporting memorandum fails to meet the standards adopted by regulation or is otherwise unacceptable to the director, the director may engage a qualified actuary, at the expense of the insurer, to review the opinion and the basis for the opinion and to prepare a supporting memorandum as required under (q) of this section.

A memorandum in support of an actuarial opinion and other supporting material provided by an insurer to the director is confidential and may not be made public by the director or another person and is not subject to a civil subpoena, except for the purpose of defending an action seeking damages from a person because of an action required by this section. The memorandum or other material may be released by the director with the written consent of the insurer or to the American Academy of Actuaries upon a request stating that the memorandum or other material is required for the purpose of a disciplinary proceeding and setting out procedures satisfactory to the director for preserving the confidentiality of the memorandum or other material. Once a portion of the memorandum or other material is cited by the insurer in its marketing, is cited before a governmental agency other than a state insurance department, or is released by the insurer to the news media, the remainder of the confidential memorandum or other material is no longer confidential.

An insurer’s aggregate reserves for

all life insurance policies, excluding disability and accidental death benefits, issued on or after July 1, 1992, may not be less than the aggregate reserves calculated under (b)(2), (4), (7), and (l) of this section, and the mortality table and rates of interest used in calculating nonforfeiture benefits for the policies; and

all policies, contracts, and benefits may not be less than the aggregate reserves determined by an appointed actuary to be necessary to render the opinion required under (m) of this section.

An insurer who submits an actuarial opinion that the insurer knew or should have known was not in compliance with this section is subject to suspension or revocation of the insurer’s certificate of authority under AS

21.09.150(a)

.

In this section, unless the context requires otherwise, “insurer” means an entity that

has written, issued, or reinsured life insurance contracts, accident and health insurance contracts, or deposit-type contracts in this state and has at least one of those policies in force or claim; or

has written, issued, or reinsured life insurance contracts in any state and is required to hold a certificate of authority to write life insurance, accident and health insurance, or deposit-type contracts in this state.

I = .03 + W(R1 — .03) + W/2(R2 — .09);

I = .03 + W(R — .03)

where R1 is the lesser of R and .09,

R2 is the greater of R and .09,

R is the reference interest rate defined in (j) of this section, and

W is the weighting factor defined in (f) of this section;

Guarantee Duration: Weighting Years Factors 10 or less .50 more than 10, but not more than 20; .45 more than 20; .35

Click to view

for life insurance, the guarantee duration is the maximum number of years the life insurance can remain in force on a basis guarantee in the policy or under an option to convert to a plan of life insurance with a premium rate or nonforfeiture value or both that are guaranteed in the original policy;

Guarantee Weighting Factor Duration: for Plan Type Years A B C 5 or less; .80 .60 .50 more than 5, but not more than 10; .75 .60 .50 more than 10, but not more than 20; .65 .50 .45 more than 20; .45 .35 .35

Click to view

History.

(§ 1 ch 120 SLA 1966; am § 1 ch 100 SLA 1978; am §§ 1, 2 ch 28 SLA 1984; am §§ 23 — 25 ch 21 SLA 1991; am §§ 24, 25 ch 67 SLA 1992; am §§ 14, 15 ch 6 SLA 1993; am §§ 23 — 26, 112 ch 62 SLA 1995; am § 32 ch 30 SLA 1996; am § 26 ch 32 SLA 1997; am §§ 6 — 13 ch 56 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1991, in the second sentence of (e), “this subsection” was substituted for “this paragraph” to correct a manifest error in ch. 28, SLA 1984.

Paragraphs (b)(3)-(7) were enacted as (b)(4)-(8). Renumbered in 2000 to reflect the 1995 repeal of former (b)(3), at which time cross references in subsection (b); paragraphs (b)(1), (b)(2), (b)(6), and (b)(7); subsection (

l

); and subsection (t) were conformed accordingly.

Cross references. —

For operative date of AS

21.45.300

as to particular insurers, see AS

21.45.300

(w).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 14, 2018, in (a), in the first sentence, inserted “, and deposit-type contracts” following “pure endowment contracts”, substituted “Issued before the operative date of the valuation manual described in AS

21.18.112

” for “, and may certify the amount of the reserves, specifying the mortality table or tables, rate or rated of interest, and methods (net level premium method or other) used in the calculation of the reserves”, in the second sentence, inserted “for policies and contracts issued before the operative date of the valuation manual described in AS

21.18.112

” following “calculating the reserves”, in the third sentence, substituted “the alien insurer's insurance” for “its insurance” following “shall be limited to” and “qualified actuary” for “competent actuary” following “may employ a” and made a related change, in the fifth sentence, substituted “This subsection provides for the minimum standard for the valuation of reserves for policies and contracts subject to this subsection and applies to a policy and contract issued before the operative date of the valuation manual described in AS 21.18.112” for “and if the official of the state or jurisdiction accepts as sufficient and valid for all legal purposes the certificate of valuation of the director when the certificate states the valuation was made in a specified manner in which the aggregate reserves would be at least as large as if they had been computed in the manner prescribed by the law of that state or jurisdiction”, in the last sentence, near the beginning, substituted “Insurer that has” for “insurer that at any time”; in (b), in the introductory language, deleted “otherwise” following “except as”, inserted “— (k) following “provided in (c)”, inserted “and (6) preceding “of this subsection”, added “, and AS

21.18.112(b)

at the end, in (a)(1), deleted “otherwise” following “except as”, inserted “— (k)” following “provided in (c)”, inserted “and (6)” preceding “of this subsection”, inserted “and AS

21.18.112(b)

,” preceding “the minimum standard”, substituted “defined in (2)(A) and (B)” for “defined in (2)” following “evaluation methods”, inserted “, and AS 21.18.112(b)” following “of this subsection”, in (b)(5), in the introductory language, substituted “in (c) — (k) of this section” for “in (C) of this paragraph”, substituted “commissioners” for “commissioner's” throughout the subsection; in (j), in the introductory language, substituted “in (d) and (e)” for “in (c)” following “interest rates referred to”; in (t)(2) substituted “an appointed actuary” for “a qualified actuary” following “determined by”; made related and stylistic changes throughout the section.

Administrative Code. —

For actuarial opinion and memorandum, see 3 AAC 21, art. 8.

For mortality tables, see 3 AAC 28, art. 7.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor's transmittal letter for ch. 56, SLA 2018 (HB 401), which amended this section, see 2018 House Journal 2601.

Collateral references. —

Liability of insurance agent or broker to insured for misrepresentation of cash surrender value or accumulated value benefits of life insurance policy. 44 ALR4th 1030.